Utah statutes.
17-19-8.   Administration of oaths -- Subpoena power.

The auditor is authorized to administer any oath or affirmation necessary to the performance of the duties of his office, and shall have power to subpoena witnesses before him and to examine into any matter that he may deem necessary.

